Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Article 2. Trial
§ 7-11-206.
Separation of jury.

In the trial of any criminal case to a jury, the court may, except for capital cases allow the jurors to separate during the trial and after the case is submitted to them.

In the trial of any capital case to the jury, the court may, with the consent of the defendant and the district attorney, allow the jurors to separate during the trial and after the case is submitted to them.

If the jurors are permitted to separate, they shall be admonished by the court that they shall not discuss the case with anyone except while deliberating in the jury room, and are not to form or express an opinion except during their deliberations in the jury room.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 147, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 7-11-212; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 4.

Cross references. —

As to death penalty for murder, see §§

6-2-101

through

6-2-103

.

“Capital case” is one in which death penalty may be imposed.

See Collins v. State, 589 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1979).

Separation in capital cases rigidly enforced. —

Former statutory requirement that jury in capital case shall not separate, so as to give opportunity to communicate with members, should be rigidly enforced. State v. Radon, 45 Wyo. 383, 19 P.2d 177,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1933).

It is normal and required that jurors be sequestered in capital cases, and this requirement should be rigidly enforced. Hopkinson v. State, 679 P.2d 1008,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 273

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 873, 105 S. Ct. 228, 83 L. Ed. 2d 157, 1984 U.S. LEXIS 360 (U.S. 1984).

When sequestration unnecessary. —

When publicity is not sensational nor inflammatory, there is no need to sequester the jury, particularly when the jury has been cautioned not to read the newspapers, listen to the radio or watch television during the trial and there is no indication that the court's instructions were violated. Collins v. State, 589 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1979).

Prejudicial separation ground for new trial. —

When defendant in capital case has shown separation of jury or opportunity for other parties, especially witnesses, to communicate with them, and it appears defendant was prejudiced or when it does not appear he was not prejudiced, new trial should be granted. State v. Goettina, 61 Wyo. 420, 158 P.2d 865,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1945).

Jury separation without prejudice does not vitiate conviction. —

In the absence of a showing of prejudice, permitting separation of a jury does not vitiate a conviction. Collins v. State, 589 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1979); Shaffer v. State, 640 P.2d 88,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1982).

Defendant not prejudiced by separation of jury if he consents. —

Defendant in a manslaughter case based on driving of a car by the defendant while intoxicated is not prejudiced by the fact that the wrecked cars of defendant and deceased were outside the courthouse and available for inspection by the jury where the defendant at the commencement of the trial tells the judge that he does not desire the jury to be kept together. State v. Cantrell, 64 Wyo. 132, 186 P.2d 539,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1947).

Juror's affidavits may show no prejudice. —

Juror's affidavits are admissible in capital case showing that no prejudice resulted from their misconduct, and if presumption of prejudice is thereby overcome, new trial should be denied. State v. Goettina, 61 Wyo. 420, 158 P.2d 865,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1945).

Where deputy sheriff commingled with jurors but juror's affidavits showed he did not discuss anything with jurors relating to case, no ground for new trial was shown. State v. Goettina, 61 Wyo. 420, 158 P.2d 865,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1945).

But affidavits not in record not considered on appeal. —

Juror's affidavits relating to alleged misconduct and to newspaper accounts of case read by them pending trial, which were not seen by district court, nor part of record on appeal and were not agreed to by state will not be considered by supreme court. State v. Goettina, 61 Wyo. 420, 158 P.2d 865,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1945).

Receipt of mail held reversible error. —

In homicide case it was reversible error to allow juror to receive mail during trial. State v. Eldredge, 45 Wyo. 488, 21 P.2d 545,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1933).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Juror's reading of newspaper account of trial in federal criminal case during its progress as ground for mistrial, new trial or reversal, 85 ALR Fed 13.

Stranger's alleged communication with juror, other than threat of violence, as prejudicial in federal criminal prosecution, 131 ALR Fed 465.